Massachusetts, session 194th, H813.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 51 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following 2 
paragraphs:- 
Every citizen who (i) is 16 or 17 years old, (ii) is not temporarily or permanently 
disqualified by law because of corrupt practices in respect to elections, (iii) is a resident in the 
city or town where they claim the right to vote at the time they register and (iv) has complied 
with the requirements of this chapter may have their name entered on the list of voters in such 
city or town and may vote therein in any municipal election. 
Every citizen who (i) is 16 or 17 years old, (ii) is not temporarily or permanently 
disqualified by law because of corrupt practices in respect to elections, (iii) is a resident in the 

of 2 10 city or town where they claim the right to vote at the time they register and (iv) has complied 
with the requirements of this chapter may have their name entered on the list of voters in such 
city or town and may vote therein in any presidential primary; provided, that, the political party 
for which a presidential primary is held shall consent to the participation of 16 and 17 year old 
voters.